test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saqgdit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - saʼgdit: # Noun 131 'eng /est sagedus/fin' - full paradigm
     saʼgdit+N+Sg+Nom: [saʼgdit, sagdit]
     saʼgdit+N+Sg+Gen: [saʼgdit, sagdit]
     saʼgdit+N+Sg+Par: [saʼgditõ, sagditõ]
     saʼgdit+N+Sg+Dat: [saʼgditõn, sagditõn]
     saʼgdit+N+Sg+Ins: [saʼgditõks, sagditõks]
     saʼgdit+N+Sg+Ill: [saʼgditõ, sagditõ]
     saʼgdit+N+Sg+Ela: [saʼgditst, sagditst]
     saʼgdit+N+Pl+Nom: [saʼgditõd, sagditõd]
     saʼgdit+N+Pl+Gen: [saʼgditõd, sagditõd]
     saʼgdit+N+Pl+Par: [saʼgditidi, sagditidi]
     saʼgdit+N+Pl+Dat: [saʼgditõdõn, sagditõdõn]
     saʼgdit+N+Pl+Ins: [saʼgditõdõks, sagditõdõks]
     saʼgdit+N+Pl+Ill: [saʼgditiž, sagditiž]
     saʼgdit+N+Pl+Ela: [saʼgditist, sagditist]
